Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-227
Students with anaphylaxis; school district policy; requirements.

(1) The Legislature finds and declares that all students with anaphylaxis have a right to work and study in a safe environment and that it is an obligation of schools to address the needs of students with anaphylaxis.

(2) On or before July 1, 2026, the school board of each school district shall adopt a written policy to address incidents of anaphylaxis involving students at school. A school board may use the model policy for use in school districts developed pursuant to section 71-1965 as a guide. Such policy shall not conflict with or hinder the implementation of an individualized anaphylaxis plan of a student and shall be consistent with section 79-224 relating to self-management by a student.

(3) A school district shall publish the policy in any school district handbook, manual, or similar publication that sets forth the comprehensive rules, procedures, and standards of conduct for students at school.

(4) A school district with a policy to address incidents of anaphylaxis involving students at school that is in effect prior to September 3, 2025, may remain in effect and shall satisfy the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to change the personal rights, liabilities, and immunities granted pursuant to section 25-21,280 of certain individuals responding to or treating life-threatening asthma or a systemic allergic reaction.

Laws 2025, LB457, § 4.